Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,275
Recreation camps; minimum health and safety requirements; local government; adopt.

A local government may by resolution, ordinance, or regulation adopt minimum health and safety requirements to protect the health and safety of persons in attendance at recreation camps.

Laws 1959, c. 328, § 5, p. 1194;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-3105;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 33.
July 18, 2026